test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-pline_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - pline: # 7 x contlex pl ine -- inte kontrollerad 
    afäärimies+N+Pl+Ine: afäärimiehissä
    eusmies+N+Pl+Ine: eusmiehissä
    frahtimies+N+Pl+Ine: frahtimiehissä
    hakkomies+N+Pl+Ine: hakkomiehissä
    ikämies+N+Pl+Ine: ikämiehissä
    irtimies+N+Pl+Ine: irtimiehissä
    iskemämies+N+Pl+Ine: iskemämiehissä
    elläin+N+Pl+Ine: elläimissä
    irtain+N+Pl+Ine: irtaimissa
    istuin+N+Pl+Ine: istuimissa
    jäänhalkein+N+Pl+Ine: jäänhalkeimissa
    jäsenyin+N+Pl+Ine: jäsenykimissä
    polkimet+N+Pl+Ine: polkimissa
    äänestys+N+Pl+Ine: äänestyksissä
    äärettömyys+N+Pl+Ine: äärettömyyksissä
    #äes+N+Pl+Ine: äkeksissä
    ähmäänys+N+Pl+Ine: ähmäänyksissä
    ajos+N+Pl+Ine: ajoksissa
    äkäsyys+N+Pl+Ine: äkäsyyksissä
    annos+N+Pl+Ine: annoksissa
    ahmajäsen+N+Pl+Ine: ahmajäsenissä
    ahven+N+Pl+Ine: ahvenissa
    askel+N+Pl+Ine: askelissa
    höyhen+N+Pl+Ine: höyhenissä
    isosisar+N+Pl+Ine: isosisarissa
    jääntanner+N+Pl+Ine: jääntanterissa
    jalkatyär+N+Pl+Ine: jalkatyttärissä
    ahneus+N+Pl+Ine: ahneuksissa
    falskeus+N+Pl+Ine: falskeuksissa
    fariseeus+N+Pl+Ine: fariseeuksissa
    #fiineys+N+Pl+Ine: fiineyksissä
    #fiiniys+N+Pl+Ine: fiiniyksissä
    ilfheys+N+Pl+Ine: ilfheyksissä
    ilkeys+N+Pl+Ine: ilkeyksissä
    jiddisch+N+Pl+Ine: jiddischissä
    -kielinen+N+Pl+Ine: -kielisissä
    äärheinen+N+Pl+Ine: äärheisissä
    ainukainen+N+Pl+Ine: ainukaisissa
    ammuminen+N+Pl+Ine: ammumisissa
    ampiainen+N+Pl+Ine: ampiaisissa
    ästiitiäinen+N+Pl+Ine: ästiitiäisissä
    äykiäinen+N+Pl+Ine: äykiäisissä
    aavistus+N+Pl+Ine: aavistuksissa
    ahistus+N+Pl+Ine: ahistuksissa
    aivastus+N+Pl+Ine: aivastuksissa
    ajatus+N+Pl+Ine: ajatuksissa
    anomus+N+Pl+Ine: anomuksissa
    arvaus+N+Pl+Ine: arvauksissa
    astutus+N+Pl+Ine: astutuksissa
    aamuvyö+N+Pl+Ine: aamuvöissä
    äkäpää+N+Pl+Ine: äkäpäissä
    äkkipää+N+Pl+Ine: äkkipäissä
    ärräpää+N+Pl+Ine: ärräpäissä
    asepuu+N+Pl+Ine: asepuissa
    mäkivyöt+N+Pl+Ine: mäkivöissä
    takkaa-ajo+N+Pl+Ine: takkaa-ajoissa
    a-malmi+N+Pl+Ine: [a-malmissa, a-malmeissa]
    ääkkä+N+Pl+Ine: ääkissä
    aalto+N+Pl+Ine: aaloissa
    abortti+N+Pl+Ine: [abortissa, abortteissa]
    aho+N+Pl+Ine: ahoissa
    äijäfaari+N+Pl+Ine: [äijäfaarissa, äijäfaareissa]
    hamut+N+Pl+Ine: hamuissa
    aihe+N+Pl+Ine: aihheissa
    äile+N+Pl+Ine: [äilheissä, äihleissä]
    aine+N+Pl+Ine: [ainheissa, aihneissa]
    alote+N+Pl+Ine: alotheissa
    alue+N+Pl+Ine: aluheissa
    #ikenheet+N+Pl+Ine: ikenissä
    akleija+N+Pl+Ine: akleijoissa
    äkseerinki+N+Pl+Ine: [äkseeringissä, äkseerinkeissä]
    almunakka+N+Pl+Ine: almunakoissa
    alttari+N+Pl+Ine: [alttarissa, alttareissa]
    ämmäkkö+N+Pl+Ine: ämmäköissä
    #ammunta+N+Pl+Ine: ammunoissa
    kamari+N+Pl+Ine: [kamarissa, kamareissa]
    ääri+N+Pl+Ine: äärissä
    äitiväki+N+Pl+Ine: äitiväissä
    ehontähti+N+Pl+Ine: ehontähissä
    ehtotähti+N+Pl+Ine: ehtotähissä
    elämänonni+N+Pl+Ine: elämänonnissa
    epiteemi+N+Pl+Ine: epiteemissä
    kuunvuoret+N+Pl+Ine: kuunvuorissa
    äitinkieli+N+Pl+Ine: äitinkielissä
    äitipuoli+N+Pl+Ine: äitipuolissa
    asuntolohi+N+Pl+Ine: asuntolohissa
    hiili+N+Pl+Ine: hiilissä
    aikakausi+N+Pl+Ine: aikakausissa
    färivesi+N+Pl+Ine: färivesissä
    hangonvarsi+N+Pl+Ine: hangonvarsissa
    hirsi+N+Pl+Ine: hirsissä
    ikävuosi+N+Pl+Ine: ikävuosissa
    ilovesi+N+Pl+Ine: ilovesissä
    polvivarsi+N+Pl+Ine: polvivarsissa
    imulapsi+N+Pl+Ine: imulapsissa
    irtilapsi+N+Pl+Ine: irtilapsissa
    jalkalapsi+N+Pl+Ine: jalkalapsissa
    jumalanlapsi+N+Pl+Ine: jumalanlapsissa
    kapalolapsi+N+Pl+Ine: kapalolapsissa
    kasvattilapsi+N+Pl+Ine: kasvattilapsissa
    kusilapsi+N+Pl+Ine: kusilapsissa
    höttölumi+N+Pl+Ine: höttölumissa
    iloliemi+N+Pl+Ine: iloliemissä
    kalanliemi+N+Pl+Ine: kalanliemissä
    kankhaanloimi+N+Pl+Ine: kankhaanloimissa
    lähetystoimi+N+Pl+Ine: lähetystoimissa
    liemi+N+Pl+Ine: liemissä
    ympäryssuoli+N+Pl+Ine: ympäryssuolissa
    auttavaisuus+N+Pl+Ine: auttavaisuuksissa
    hankaluus+N+Pl+Ine: hankaluuksissa
    hiljasuus+N+Pl+Ine: hiljasuuksissa
    huoruus+N+Pl+Ine: huoruuksissa
    iänkaikkisuus+N+Pl+Ine: iänkaikkisuuksissa
    itusuus+N+Pl+Ine: itusuuksissa
    jatkuvuus+N+Pl+Ine: jatkuvuuksissa
    evankeeljum+N+Pl+Ine: evankeeljumissa
    lippanen+N+Pl+Ine: lippasissa
    Antinpäivä+N+Pl+Ine: Antinpäivissä
    Kruunu+N+Pl+Ine: Kruunuissa
    Kyriiri+N+Pl+Ine: [Kyriirissä, Kyriireissä]
    tavara+N+Pl+Ine: tavaroissa
    #Laurina+N+Pl+Ine: Laurinaissa
    Mikkelinpäivä+N+Pl+Ine: Mikkelinpäivissä
    norrlänska+N+Pl+Ine: norrlänskoissa
    TV-masti+N+Pl+Ine: [TV-mastissa, TV-masteissa]
    äänensävy+N+Pl+Ine: äänensävyissä
    alunastifti+N+Pl+Ine: [alunastiftissä, alunastifteissä]
    romani chib+N+Pl+Ine: romani chibissä
